Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2104
Approved educational program, defined.

(1) Approved educational program means a program of education and training accredited by an agency listed in subsection (2) of this section or approved by the board. Such approval may be based on the program's accreditation by an accrediting agency with requirements similar to an agency listed in subsection (2) of this section or on standards established by the board in the manner and form provided in section 38-133.

(2) Approved educational program includes a program of education and training accredited by:

(a) The Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education;

(b) The Council for Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs;

(c) The Council on Rehabilitation Education;

(d) The Council on Social Work Education;

(e) The American Psychological Association for a doctoral degree program enrolled in by a person who has a master's degree or its equivalent in psychology; or

(f) The American Art Therapy Association or the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs for a master's degree program in art therapy.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,255;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,297;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 723;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 5.